Massachusetts, session 194th, H4170.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 59A of chapter 43 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the current vacancy in the office of ward 7 councilor
shall not be filled by a special municipal election and instead shall be filled by a majority of vote
of the city council of the city of Marlborough to appoint the person elected to the office of ward
7 councilor at the regular 2025 municipal election to fill the remainder of the unexpired term.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1